test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VAI_N_IMP_gwekishin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI+Imp - N - gwekshin :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: gwekshinan
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: gwekshinog
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: gwekshindaa #/adaa/
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Del+2: gwekshinoodan
     #gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Del+21Pl: UNKNOWN
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: gwekshinookeg
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Neg+2: gwekshinge
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Neg+2+Pl: gwekshingego
     gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl: [gwekshinziidaa, gwekshinsiidaa] #/asiidaa/
